North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 13. Grants Vacated.

§ 146-61.
Civil action to vacate grant.

When any person claiming title to lands under a grant or patent from the King of Great Britain, any of the lords proprietors of North Carolina, or from the State of North Carolina, shall consider himself aggrieved by any grant or patent issued or made since July 4, 1776, to any other person, against law or obtained by false suggestions, surprise, or fraud, the person aggrieved may bring a civil action in the superior court for the county in which such land may be, together with an authenticated copy of such grant or patent, briefly stating the grounds whereon such patent should be repealed and vacated, whereupon the grantee, patentee, or the person, owner, or claimant under such grant or patent, shall be required to show cause why the same shall not be repealed and vacated.

History.

R.C., c. 42, s. 29; Code, s. 2786; Rev., s. 1748; C.S., s. 7594; G.S., s. 146-67; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Removing Local Elected Officials From Office in North Carolina,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 547 (1980).

§ 146-62.
Judgment recorded in Secretary of State’s office.

If, upon verdict or demurrer, the court believe that the patent or grant was made against law or obtained by fraud, surprise, or upon untrue suggestions, it may vacate the same; and a copy of such judgment, after being recorded at large, shall be filed by the petitioner in the Secretary of State’s office, where it shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose; and the Secretary shall note in the margin of the original record of the grant the entry of the judgment, with a reference to the record in his office.

History.

R.C., c. 42, s. 30; Code, s. 2787; Rev., s. 1749; C.S., s. 7595; G.S., s. 146-68; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-63.
Action by State to vacate grants.

An action may be brought by the Attorney General in the name of the State for the purpose of vacating or annulling letters patent granted by the State, in the following cases:

When he has reason to believe that such letters patent were obtained by means of some fraudulent suggestion or concealment of a material fact, made by the person to whom the same were issued or made, or with his consent or knowledge; or

When he has reason to believe that such letters patent were issued through mistake, or in ignorance of a material fact; or

When he has reason to believe that the patentee, or those claiming under him, have done or omitted an act in violation of the terms and conditions on which the letters patent were granted, or have by any other means forfeited the interest acquired under the same.

History.

C. C. P., s. 367; Code, s. 2788; Rev., s. 1750; C.S., s. 7596; G.S., s. 146-69; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on defining navigable waters and the application of the public trust doctrine in North Carolina, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 888 (1971).